Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.280

Ethnic and cultural diversity—Development of curriculum for understanding—Training.

The criminal justice training commission shall develop, in consultation with the administrative office of the courts and the commissions established under chapters 43.113, 43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a curriculum for a general understanding of ethnic and cultural diversity and its implications for working with youth of color and their families. The curriculum shall be developed by October 1, 1993. The commission shall ensure that ethnic and diversity training becomes an integral part of the training of law enforcement personnel so as to incorporate cultural sensitivity and awareness into the daily activities of law enforcement personnel.

[ 2005 c 282 s 46; 1993 c 415 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—1993 c 415: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Ethnic and cultural diversity—Development of curriculum for understanding: RCW 2.56.030.